Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS APPLYING TO HEALTH PROFESSIONS GENERALLY

CHAPTER 116. TRAINING COURSE ON HUMAN TRAFFICKING PREVENTION

Sec. 116.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(2) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

(3) "Health care practitioner" means an individual who holds a license, certificate, permit, or other authorization issued under this title to engage in a health care profession and who provides direct patient care.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 796 (H.B. 2059), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 116.002. REQUIRED TRAINING COURSE ON HUMAN TRAFFICKING PREVENTION FOR CERTAIN HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS. (a) A health care practitioner, other than a physician or nurse, within the time prescribed by commission rule shall successfully complete a training course approved by the executive commissioner on identifying and assisting victims of human trafficking.

(b) The executive commissioner shall:

(1) approve training courses on human trafficking prevention, including at least one course that is available without charge; and

(2) post a list of the approved training courses on the commission's Internet website.

(c) The executive commissioner shall update the list of approved training courses described by Subsection (b) as necessary and consider for approval training courses conducted by health care facilities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 796 (H.B. 2059), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 116.003. TRAINING REQUIRED FOR LICENSE RENEWAL. A health care practitioner, other than a physician or nurse, shall successfully complete a training course described by Section 116.002 as a condition for renewal of a license issued to the health care practitioner under this title.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 796 (H.B. 2059), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.